Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-5,106
Class I, II, III, IV, or V school district; children residing on federal property; contracts with federal government for instruction; effect of existing available facilities.

The provisions of giving instructions outside a Class I, II, III, IV, or V school district as provided in section 79-5,105 shall not apply where existing facilities are now available.

Laws 1957, c. 350, § 2, p. 1195;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-545;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 359;

Laws 2024, LB1329, § 66.
July 19, 2024